California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The transit district employer shall grant a request for recognition filed pursuant to Section 99564 except in one of the following circumstances:

(a) The employer reasonably doubts that the employee organization has majority support or reasonably doubts the appropriateness of the requested unit. In that case the employer shall notify the board which shall conduct a representation election pursuant to Section 99564.4 unless subdivision (c) or (d) applies.

(b) Another employee organization either files with the employer a challenge to the appropriateness of the unit or submits a competing claim of representation within 15 workdays of the posting of notice of the written request. If the claim is evidenced by the support that at least 30 percent of the members of the proposed unit, a question of representation shall be deemed to exist and the board shall conduct a representation election pursuant to Section 99564.4, or if the claim is evidenced by the support of at least 10 percent of the members of the proposed unit, the board shall conduct inquiries and investigations or hold hearings that it deems necessary in order to decide the questions raised by the claim and may conduct a representation election pursuant to Section 99564.4. Evidence of that support shall be submitted to either the board or to a mutually agreed upon third party.

(c) There is currently in effect a lawful written memorandum of understanding between the employer and another employee organization recognized or certified as the exclusive representative of any employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition, unless the request for recognition is filed not more than 120 days and not less than 90 days prior to the expiration date of such memorandum of understanding. However, if a memorandum of understanding has been in effect for three years or more, there shall be no restriction as to the time of filing the request.

(d) Within the previous 12 months either another employee organization has been lawfully recognized or certified as the exclusive representative of any employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition, or a majority of the votes cast in a representation election held pursuant to Section 99564.4 were cast for “no
 representation.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99564.2.

A petition may be filed with the board, in accordance with its rules and regulations, requesting it to investigate and decide the question of whether employees have selected or wish to select an exclusive representative or to determine the appropriateness of a unit, by one of the following:

(a) An employee organization alleging that it has filed a request for recognition as an exclusive representative with an employer and that the request has been denied or has not been acted upon within 30 days
 after the filing of the request.

(b) An employee organization alleging that it has filed a competing claim of representation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99564.1.

(c) An employee organization wishing to be certified by the board as the exclusive representative. The petition for certification as the exclusive representative in an appropriate unit shall include proof of a 30-percent showing of interest designating the organization as the exclusive representative of the employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99564.3.

A petition may be filed with the board, in accordance with its rules and regulations, requesting it to investigate and decide the question of whether the employees wish to decertify an exclusive representative or to reconsider the appropriateness of a unit. The petition may allege that the employees in an appropriate unit no longer desire a particular employee organization as their exclusive representative. The petition shall include proof of a 30-percent showing of interest indicating support for another organization or lack of support for the incumbent
 exclusive representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99564.4.

(a) Upon receipt of a petition filed pursuant to Section 99564.2, the board shall conduct inquiries and investigations or hold hearings as it deems necessary in order to decide the questions raised by the petition. The determination of the board may be based upon the evidence adduced in the inquiries, investigations, or hearings. If the board finds on the basis of the evidence that a question of representation exists, or a question of representation is deemed to exist pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 99564.1, it shall order
 that an election shall be conducted by secret ballot placing on the ballot all employee organizations evidencing support of at least 10 percent of the members of an appropriate unit, and it shall certify the results of the election on the basis of which ballot choice received a majority of the valid votes cast. There shall be printed on the initial ballot the choice of “no representation.” If, at any election, no choice on the ballot receives a majority of the votes cast, a runoff election shall be conducted. The ballot for the runoff election shall provide for a selection between the two choices receiving the largest and second largest number of valid votes cast in the election.

(b) No election shall be held and the petition shall be dismissed whenever either of the following exists:

(1) There is currently in effect a memorandum of understanding between the employer and another
 employee organization recognized or certified as the exclusive representative of any employees included in the unit described in the petition, unless the petition is filed not more than 120 days and not less than 90 days prior to the expiration date of the memorandum. However, if the memorandum has been in effect for three years or more, there shall be no restriction as to time of filing the petition.

(2) Within the previous 12 months either an employee organization other than the petitioner has been lawfully recognized or certified as the exclusive representative of any employees included in the unit described in the petition, or a majority of the votes cast in a representation election held pursuant to subdivision (a) were cast for “no representation.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99564.5.

The employee organization recognized or certified as the exclusive representative shall represent all employees in the unit, fairly and impartially. A breach of this duty shall be deemed to have occurred if the employee organization’s conduct in representation is arbitrary, discriminatory, or in bad faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Unit Determination [99565. - 99565.]

99565.

(a) In each case where the appropriateness of a unit is an issue, in determining an appropriate unit, the board shall take into consideration all of the following criteria:

(1) The internal and occupational community of interest among the employees, including, but not limited to, the extent to which they perform functionally related services or work toward established common goals, the history of employee representation with the employer, the extent to which the employees
 belong to the same employee organization, the extent to which the employees have common skills, working conditions, job duties, or similar educational or training requirements, and the extent to which the employees have common supervision.

(2) The effect that the projected unit will have on the meet and confer relationships, emphasizing the availability and authority of employer representatives to deal effectively with employee organizations representing the unit, and taking into account factors such as work location, the numerical size of the unit, the relationship of the unit to organizational patterns of the transit district employer, and the effect on the existing classification structure or existing classification schematic of dividing a single class or single classification schematic among two or more units.

(3) The effect of the proposed unit on efficient operations of the
 employer and the compatibility of the unit with the responsibility of the transit district employer and its employees to serve the public.

(4) The number of employees and classifications in a proposed unit, and its effect on the operations of the employer, on the objectives of providing the employees the right to effective representation, and on the meet and confer relationship.

(5) The impact on the meet and confer relationship created by fragmentation of employee groups or any proliferation of units among the employees of the employer.

(b) The board shall not determine that any unit is appropriate if it includes, together with other employees, employees who are defined as peace officers pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Organizational Security [99566. - 99566.3.]

99566.

Subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter, organizational security shall be within the scope of representation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99566.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon receiving notice from the exclusive representative of a transit district employee who is in a unit for which an exclusive representative has been selected pursuant to this chapter, the employer shall deduct the amount of the fair share service fee authorized by this section from the wages and salary of the employee and pay that amount to the employee organization. Thereafter, the employee shall, as a condition of continued employment, be required either to join the recognized employee
 organization or pay the fair share service fee. The amount of the fee shall not exceed the dues that are payable by members of the employee organization, and shall cover the cost of negotiation, contract administration, and other activities of the employee organization that are germane to its functions as the exclusive bargaining representative. Agency fee payers shall have the right, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, to receive a rebate or fee reduction upon request, of that portion of their fee that is not devoted to the cost of negotiations, contract administration, and other activities of the employee organization that are germane to its function as the exclusive bargaining representative.

(b) The costs covered by the fee under this section may include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, the cost of lobbying activities designed to foster collective bargaining negotiations and contract administration, or to secure for the
 represented employees advantages in wages, hours, and other conditions of employment in addition to those secured through meeting and negotiating with the employer.

(c) The arrangement described in subdivision (a) shall remain in effect unless it is rescinded pursuant to subdivision (d). The employer shall remain neutral, and shall not participate in any election conducted under this section unless required to do so by the board.

(d) (1) The arrangement described in subdivision (a) may be rescinded by a majority vote of all the employees in the negotiating unit subject to that arrangement, if a request for a vote is supported by a petition containing the signatures of at least 30 percent of the employees in the negotiating unit, and the signatures are obtained in one year. There shall not be more than one vote taken during the term of any collective
 bargaining agreement.

(2) If the arrangement described in subdivision (a) is rescinded pursuant to paragraph (1), a majority of all employees in the negotiating unit may request that the arrangement be reinstated. That request shall be submitted to the board along with a petition containing the signatures of at least 30 percent of the employees in the negotiating unit. The vote shall be conducted at the worksite by secret ballot, and shall be conducted no sooner than one year after the rescission of the arrangement under this subdivision.

(3) If the board determines that the appropriate number of signatures have been collected, it shall conduct the vote to rescind or reinstate in a manner that it shall prescribe in accordance with this subdivision.

(4) The cost of conducting an election under this subdivision to
 reinstate the organizational security arrangement shall be borne by the petitioning party and the cost of conducting an election to rescind the arrangement shall be borne by the board.

(e) The recognized employee organization shall indemnify and hold the transit district employer harmless against any reasonable legal fees, legal costs, and settlement or judgment liability arising from any court or administrative action relating to the transit district’s compliance with this section. The recognized employee organization shall have the exclusive right to determine whether any such action or proceeding shall or shall not be compromised, resisted, defended, tried, or appealed. This indemnification and hold harmless duty shall not apply to actions related to compliance with this section brought by the exclusive representative of transit district employees against the transit district employer.

(f) The employer of a transit district employee shall provide the exclusive representative of an employee with the home address of each member of a bargaining unit, regardless of when that employee commences employment, so that the exclusive representative can comply with the notification requirements set forth by the United States Supreme Court in Chicago Teachers Union v. Hudson (1986) 475 U.S. 292.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99566.2.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 99560.1, Section 99566, or any other provision of this chapter, any employee who is a member of a religious body whose traditional tenets or teachings include objections to joining or financially supporting employee organizations shall not be required to join, maintain membership in, or financially support any employee organization as a condition of employment except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The employee may be
 required, in lieu of a service fee, to pay sums equal to the service fee either to a nonreligious, nonlabor organization, charitable fund exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, chosen by the employee from a list of at least three such funds, designated in the organizational security arrangement, or if the arrangement fails to designate funds, then to any such fund chosen by the employee. Either the employee organization or the transit district employer may require that proof of the payments be made on an annual basis to the transit district employer as a condition of continued exemption from the requirement of financial support to the recognized employee organization. If the employee who holds conscientious objections pursuant to this section requests the employee organization to use the grievance procedure or arbitration procedure on the employee’s behalf, the employee organization is authorized to charge the employee for the reasonable cost of using that
 procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99566.3.

Every recognized or certified employee organization shall keep an adequate itemized record of its financial transactions and shall make available annually, to the board and to the employees who are members of the organization, within 60 days after the end of its fiscal year, a detailed written financial report of its financial transactions in the form of a balance sheet and an operating statement, signed and certified as to accuracy by its president and treasurer, or corresponding principal officers. In the event of noncompliance with this section, any
 employee within the organization may petition the board for an order compelling compliance, or the board may issue a compliance order on its motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Rights-Disputes Arbitration [99567. - 99567.]

99567.

(a) An employer and an exclusive representative who enter into a written memorandum of understanding may agree to procedures for final and binding arbitration of disputes that may arise under the memorandum of understanding or between the parties.

(b) Where a party to a memorandum of understanding is aggrieved by the failure, neglect, or refusal of the other party to proceed to arbitration pursuant to the procedures provided in the memorandum, the aggrieved party may bring
 proceedings pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure for a court order directing that the arbitration proceed pursuant to the procedures provided in the memorandum of understanding.

(c) An arbitration award made pursuant to this section shall be final and binding upon the parties and may be enforced by a court pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The board shall submit a list of names of arbitrators to employers and employee organizations upon their mutual request. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the parties from mutually agreeing to some other means of selecting an arbitrator. The board shall also, if mutually requested to do so, designate an arbitrator to hear and decide the rights dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Impasse Procedures [99568. - 99568.]

99568.

The impasse procedures contained in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1137) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Labor Code shall govern any impasse proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Public Notice [99569. - 99569.]

99569.

(a) All initial proposals of exclusive representatives and of transit district employers, that relate to matters within the scope of representation, shall be presented at a public meeting of the transit district employer and thereafter shall be public records.

(b) Meeting and conferring shall not commence on an initial proposal until a reasonable time has elapsed after the submission of the proposal to enable the public to become informed and the public has the opportunity to
 express itself regarding the proposal at a meeting of the transit district employer.

(c) After the public has had the opportunity to express itself, the transit district employer shall, at a meeting that is open to the public, adopt a proposal, including any changes to its initial proposal that the transit district employer deems appropriate based on the public’s comments.

(d) New subjects of meeting and conferring arising after the presentation of initial proposals shall be made public within 24 hours. If a vote is taken on a new subject by the transit district employer, the vote on the subject by each member voting shall also be made public within 24 hours.

(e) The board may adopt regulations for the purpose of implementing this section, which are consistent with the intent of the section, that the public be
 informed of the issues that are being met and conferred upon and have full opportunity to express their views on the issues to the transit district employer, and to know of the positions of the transit district employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Miscellaneous [99570. - 99570.4.]

99570.

The following proceedings set forth in this section are exempt from the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), unless the parties mutually agree otherwise:

(a) Any meeting and conferring discussion between a transit district employer and a recognized or certified employee organization.

(b) Any meeting of a mediator with either party or both parties to
 the meeting and conferring process.

(c) Any hearing, meeting, or investigation conducted by a factfinder or arbitrator.

(d) Any executive session of the transit district employer or between the transit district employer and its designated representatives for the purpose of discussing its position respecting meeting and conferring or regarding any matter within the scope of representation or instructing its designated representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99570.1.

No memorandum of understanding shall contravene any federal or state law, including rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such laws, prohibiting discrimination in employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99570.2.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99570.3.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive employees of their rights pursuant to the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964 (49 U.S.C. Section 5301 et seq.) and the agreements entered into pursuant to Section 5333(b) of Title 49 of that act.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive employees of their rights pursuant Sections 130051.24 and 130110 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99570.4.

For employees of the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transportation Authority covered under this chapter, this chapter shall supersede subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 30750 and Sections 30751 and 30755.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Administrative Enforcement for Fare Evasion and Prohibited Conducts [99580. - 99582.]

99580.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 640 of the Penal Code, a public transportation agency may enact and enforce an ordinance to impose and enforce an administrative penalty for any of the acts described in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Evasion of the payment of a fare of the system.

(2) Misuse of a transfer, pass, ticket, or token with the intent to evade the payment of a fare.

(3) Playing unreasonably loud sound equipment on or in a system facility or vehicle, or failing to comply with the warning of a transit official related to disturbing
 another person by loud or unreasonable noise.

(4) Smoking a tobacco product, eating, or drinking in or on a system facility or vehicle in those areas where those activities are prohibited by that system.

(5) Expectorating upon a system facility or vehicle.

(6) Willfully disturbing others on or in a system facility or vehicle by engaging in boisterous or unruly behavior.

(7) Carrying an explosive or acid, flammable liquid, or toxic or hazardous material in a system facility or vehicle.

(8) Urinating or defecating in a system facility or vehicle, except in a lavatory. However, this paragraph shall not
 apply to a person
 who cannot comply with this paragraph as a result of a disability, age, or a medical condition.

(9) (A) Willfully blocking the free movement of another person in a system facility or vehicle.

(B) This paragraph shall not be interpreted to affect any lawful activities permitted or First Amendment rights protected under the laws of this state or applicable federal law, including, but not limited to, laws related to collective bargaining, labor relations, or labor disputes.

(10) Skateboarding, roller skating, bicycle riding, or roller blading in a system facility, including a parking structure, or in a system vehicle. This paragraph does not apply to an activity that is necessary
 for utilization of a system facility by a bicyclist, including, but not limited to, an activity that is necessary for parking a bicycle or transporting a bicycle aboard a system vehicle, if that activity is conducted with the permission of the agency of the system in a manner that does not interfere with the safety of the bicyclist or other patrons of the system facility.

(11) (A) Unauthorized use of a discount ticket or failure to present, upon request from a system representative, acceptable proof of eligibility to use a discount ticket, in accordance with Section 99155, and posted system identification policies when entering or exiting a system station or vehicle. Acceptable proof of eligibility must be clearly defined in the posting.

(B) If an eligible discount ticket
 user is not in possession of acceptable proof at the time of request, an issued notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation shall be held for a period of 72 hours to allow the user to produce acceptable proof. If the proof is provided, that notice shall be voided. If the proof is not produced within that time period, that notice shall be processed.

(12) Selling or peddling any goods, merchandise, property, or services of any kind whatsoever on the facilities, vehicles, or property of the public transportation system without the express written consent of the public transportation system or its duly authorized representatives.

(13) Failing to yield seating reserved for an elderly or disabled person.

(c) (1) The public transportation agency may contract with a private vendor or governmental agency for the processing of notices of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation, and notices of delinquent fare evasion or passenger conduct violation pursuant to Section 99581.

(2) For the purpose of this chapter, “processing agency” means either of the following:

(A) The agency issuing the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation and the notice of delinquent fare evasion or passenger conduct violation.

(B) The party responsible for processing the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation and the notice of delinquent violation, if a contract is entered into pursuant to
 paragraph (1).

(3) For the purpose of this chapter, “fare evasion or passenger conduct violation penalty” includes, but is not limited to, a late payment penalty, administrative fee, fine, assessment, and costs of collection as provided for in the ordinance.

(4) For the purpose of this chapter, “public transportation agency” shall mean a public agency that provides public
 transportation as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1 of Article XIXA of the California Constitution.

(5) All fare evasion and passenger conduct violation penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited with the public transportation agency that issued the citation.

(d) (1) If a fare evasion or passenger conduct violation is observed by a person authorized to enforce the ordinance, a notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation shall be issued. The notice shall set forth the violation, including reference to the ordinance setting forth the administrative penalty, the date of the violation, the approximate time, and the location where the violation occurred. The notice shall include a
 printed statement indicating the date payment is required to be made, and the procedure for contesting the notice. The notice shall be served by personal service upon the violator. The notice, or copy of the notice, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the issuing agency and the processing agency, and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice establishing a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(2) When a notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation has been served, the person issuing the notice shall file the notice with the processing agency.

(3) If, after a notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation is issued pursuant to this section, the issuing officer determines
 that there is incorrect data on the notice, including, but not limited to, the date or time, the issuing officer may indicate in writing on a form attached to the original notice the necessary correction to allow for the timely entry of the corrected notice on the processing agency’s data system. A copy of the correction shall be mailed to the address provided by the person cited at the time the original notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation was served.

(4) If a person contests a notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation, the issuing agency shall proceed in accordance with Section 99581.

(e) In setting the amounts of administrative penalties for the violations listed in subdivision (b), the public transportation agency shall not establish penalty
 amounts that exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) upon a first or second violation and two hundred dollars ($200) upon a third or subsequent violation.

(f) The issuing agency shall allow payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty or penalties in installments or deferred payment if the total amount of the fines is two hundred dollars ($200) or more and the person provides satisfactory evidence of an inability to pay the penalty or penalties in full.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the issuing agency shall permit the performance of community service in lieu of
 payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty if the person is under 18 years of age or if the person provides satisfactory evidence of an inability to pay the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty in full. The issuing agency may require the performance of community service at transit facilities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 640 of the Penal Code.

(2) The issuing agency is not required to permit the performance of community service in lieu of payment for a fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty if the person has had more than three fare evasion or passenger conduct penalties for which he or she was permitted to perform community service pursuant to paragraph (1), and did not complete any community service, provided that the person was offered a community service placement and was given
 adequate time to comply with the community service requirement.

(h) A person who receives a notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation pursuant to this section shall not be subject to citation for a violation of Section 640 of the Penal Code.

(i) If an entity enacts an ordinance pursuant to this section it shall, both two years and five years after enactment of the ordinance, report all of the following information to the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing and the Assembly Committee on Transportation:

(1) A description of the ordinance, including the circumstances under which an alleged violator is afforded the opportunity to complete the administrative process.

(2) The amount of the administrative penalties.

(3) The number and types of citations administered pursuant to the ordinance.

(4) To the extent available, a comparison of the number and types of citations administered pursuant to the ordinance with the number and types of citations issued for similar offenses and administered through the courts both in the two years prior to the ordinance and, if any, since enactment of the ordinance.

(5) A discussion of the effect of the ordinance on passenger behavior.

(6) A discussion of the effect of the ordinance on revenues to the entity described in
 subdivision (a) and, in consultation with the superior courts, the cost savings to the county courts. The superior courts are encouraged to collaborate on and provide data for this report.

(j) For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(k) For purposes of this section, “tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99580.5.

A transit district’s ordinance may be enforced outside of the transit district’s jurisdiction only where the local jurisdiction has adopted the transit district’s ordinance by reference as authorized by the local jurisdictions’ governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.   (AB 1337)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

99581.

(a) For a period of 21 calendar days from the issuance to a person of the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation, the person may request an initial review of the violation by the issuing agency. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. There shall be no charge for this review. If, following the initial review, the issuing agency is satisfied that the violation did not occur or that extenuating circumstances make dismissal of the administrative penalty appropriate in the interest of justice, the issuing agency shall cancel the notice. The issuing agency shall advise the processing agency, if any, of the cancellation. The issuing agency or the processing agency shall mail the results of the initial review to
 the person contesting the notice and if following that review, cancellation of the notice does not occur, the agency shall include a reason for that denial, notification of the ability to request an administrative hearing, and notice of the procedure adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) for waiving prepayment of the penalty based upon inability to pay.

(b) If the person is dissatisfied with the results of the initial review, the person may request an administrative hearing of the violation no later than 21 calendar days following the mailing of the results of the issuing agency’s initial review. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. The person requesting an administrative hearing shall deposit with the processing agency the amount due under the notice for which the administrative hearing is requested. The issuing
 agency shall adopt a written procedure to allow a person to request an administrative hearing without payment of the amount due upon satisfactory proof of an inability to pay the amount due. An administrative hearing shall be held within 90 calendar days following the receipt of a request for an administrative hearing, excluding time tolled pursuant to this chapter. The person requesting the hearing may request one continuance, not to exceed 21 calendar days.

(c) The administrative hearing process shall include all of the following:

(1) The person requesting a hearing shall have the choice of a hearing by mail or in person. An in-person hearing shall be conducted within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency. If an issuing agency contracts with a private vendor pursuant to paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 99580, hearings shall be held within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency.

(2) The administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with written procedures established by the issuing agency and approved by the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency. The hearing shall provide an independent, objective, fair, and impartial review of contested violations.

(3) The administrative review shall be conducted before a hearing officer designated to conduct the review by the issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive officer. In addition to any other requirements of employment, a hearing officer shall demonstrate those qualifications, training, and objectivity prescribed by the issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive
 as are necessary and which are consistent with the duties and responsibilities set forth in this chapter. The hearing officer’s continued employment, performance evaluation, compensation, and benefits shall not be directly or indirectly linked to the amount of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation penalties imposed by the hearing officer.

(4) The person who issued the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation shall not be required to participate in an administrative hearing. The issuing agency shall not be required to produce any evidence other than the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation. The documentation in proper form shall be prima facie evidence of the violation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 99580.

(5) The
 hearing officer’s decision following the administrative hearing may be personally delivered to the person by the hearing officer or sent by first-class mail.

(6) Following a determination by the hearing officer that a person committed the violation, the hearing officer may, and consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 99580, shall, allow payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty in installments or deferred payment if the person provides satisfactory evidence of an inability to pay the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty in full. The hearing officer may, and consistent with subdivision (g) of Section 99580, shall, permit the performance of community service in lieu of payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 219, Sec. 3.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99582.

(a) Within 30 calendar days after the mailing or personal delivery of the decision described in subdivision (c) of Section 99581, the person may seek review by filing an appeal to be heard by the superior court where the same shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the processing agency’s file in the case shall be received in evidence. A copy of the notice of fare evasion or passenger conduct violation shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein establishing a rebuttable presumption
 affecting the burden of producing evidence. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served in person or by first-class mail upon the processing agency by the person filing the appeal. For purposes of computing the 30-calendar-day period, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable. A proceeding under this subdivision is a limited civil case.
